Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 1
DISCLOSURES, NOTICES, RECORDS,
AND ADVERTISING

5-3-101. Applicability - information required.

For purposes of this section, a consumer credit transaction includes a transaction secured primarily by an interest in land without regard to the rate of the finance charge if the consumer credit transaction is otherwise a consumer credit transaction.

The creditor shall disclose to the consumer to whom credit is extended with respect to a consumer credit transaction the information, disclosures, and notices required by the federal "Truth in Lending Act", the federal "Consumer Leasing Act", and any regulation thereunder.

The information, disclosures, and notices required by subsection (2) of this section must be provided if the transaction is a consumer credit transaction under this code even though the transaction is one of a class of credit transactions exempted from the federal "Truth in Lending Act", the federal "Consumer Leasing Act", and any regulation thereunder.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1214, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 28, § 4, effective March 9.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-301, as it existed prior to 2000.

Cross references:

For the definitions and federal statutory cites of the "Truth in Lending Act" and the "Consumer Leasing Act", see § 5-1-302.

5-3-102. Notice of assignment.

The consumer is authorized to pay the original creditor until the consumer receives notification of assignment of rights to payment pursuant to a consumer credit transaction and that payment is to be made to the assignee. A notification that does not reasonably identify the rights assigned is ineffective. If requested by the consumer, the assignee must seasonably furnish reasonable proof that the assignment has been made and unless the assignee does so the consumer may pay the original creditor.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1214, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-3-406, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-3-103. Change in terms of revolving credit accounts.

If a creditor makes a change in the terms of a revolving account without complying with this section, any additional cost or charge to the consumer resulting from the change is an excess charge and subject to the remedies available to consumers described in section 5-5-202 and to the administrator described in section 5-6-114.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) or (c) of this subsection (2), whenever any term of a revolving credit account is changed or the required minimum periodic payment thereon is increased, the creditor shall mail or deliver written notice of the change, at least one billing cycle before the effective date of the change, to each consumer who may be affected by the change.

The notice required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be given in advance, but need not be given one billing cycle in advance, if the change has been agreed to by the consumer or if the change is an increase in a finance charge, periodic rate, or other charge permitted under section 5-2-202 as a result of the consumer's delinquency or default.

The notice otherwise required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) is not required if the change:

Results from the consumer's delinquency or default but is not of a kind listed in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2);

Results from an agreement related to a court proceeding or arbitration;

Is a reduction of any charge or component thereof; or

Is a suspension of future credit privileges or termination of a consumer credit transaction.

The notice provisions of subsection (2) of this section shall not apply if:

The consumer, after receiving notice in writing of the specific change, agrees in writing to the change;

The consumer elects to pay an amount designated on a billing statement as including a new charge for a benefit offered to the consumer when the benefit and charge constitutes the change in terms and when the billing statement also states the amount payable if the new charge is excluded;

The change involves no significant cost to the consumer; or

The agreement provides limitations on changing of terms that are more restrictive than the requirements of subsection (2) of this section.

The notice provided for in this section is given to the consumer when mailed to the consumer at the address used by the creditor for sending periodic billing statements.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1214, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-416, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-3-104. Receipts - statements of account - evidence of payment.

The creditor shall deliver or mail to the consumer, without request, a written receipt for each payment by coin or currency on an obligation pursuant to a consumer credit transaction. A periodic statement showing a payment received by the creditor complies with this subsection (1).

Upon written request of a consumer, the creditor of a consumer credit transaction, other than one pursuant to a revolving credit account, shall provide a written statement of the dates and amounts of payments made within the twelve months preceding the month in which the request is received and the total amount unpaid as of the end of the period covered by the statement. The statement shall be provided without charge twice during each year of the term of the obligation. If additional statements are requested, the creditor may charge not more than ten dollars for each additional statement.

Within thirty days after a consumer has fulfilled all obligations with respect to a consumer credit transaction, other than one pursuant to a revolving credit account, the creditor shall deliver or mail to the consumer written evidence acknowledging payment in full of all obligations with respect to the transaction and written evidence of release of any security interest and termination of any financing statement held, retained, or acquired.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire R&RE, p. 1216, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-5-110, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-3-105. Notice to cosigners and similar parties.

No natural person, other than the spouse of the consumer, shall be obligated as a cosigner, comaker, guarantor, endorser, surety, or similar party with respect to a consumer credit transaction, unless before or contemporaneously with signing any agreement of obligation or any writing setting forth the terms of the consumer's agreement, the person receives a written notice that contains a completed identification of the debt he or she may have to pay and reasonably informs such person of his or her obligation with respect to it. Such written notice may be set forth in the consumer's agreement of obligation or in a separate writing. For purposes of this section, the word "cosigner", "comaker", "guarantor", "endorser", or "surety" means a natural person who, by agreement and without compensation, renders himself or herself liable for the obligation of another in a consumer credit transaction, and the terms "agreement" and "consumer's agreement" mean the original underlying agreement.

The notice required by this section must be clear and conspicuous notice and comply with the disclosure requirements of 16 CFR 444.3, 12 CFR 227.14, or 12 CFR 535.3.

The notice required by this section need not be given to a seller, lessor, or lender who is obligated to an assignee of his or her rights.

A person entitled to notice pursuant to this section shall also be given a copy of any writing setting forth the terms of the consumer's agreement and of any separate agreement of obligation signed by the person entitled to the notice.

A cosignor is entitled to a notice of right to cure pursuant to sections 5-5-110 (4) and 5-5-111 (3).

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1216, § 1, effective July 1.

5-3-106. Disclosures for real estate secured consumer credit transactions.

With respect to a real estate secured consumer credit transaction payable in installments, other than one pursuant to a revolving credit account, if the creditor credits payments made after the due date as of the date of receipt rather than the date payment was due, the creditor must clearly and conspicuously disclose to the consumer at or before the time that credit is extended the effect of untimely payments using language in substantially the following form:

A creditor that makes or arranges for extensions of consumer loans secured by a dwelling and that uses credit scores for that purpose shall, upon request of the consumer, provide to the consumer to whom the credit report relates, as soon as practicable and reasonable, but in a period not to exceed thirty days, a copy of the information specifically required to be disclosed pursuant to section 5-18-107 (1) in a form obtained from a consumer reporting agency as defined in section 5-18-103 (4). The creditor may charge a reasonable fee for making such information available to the consumer and such charge shall be an additional charge within the meaning of section 5-2-202 and not part of the finance charge.

Nothing in subsection (2) of this section shall require the creditor to:

Explain to the consumer the information specifically required to be disclosed pursuant to section 5-18-107 (1);

Disclose any information other than the information required pursuant to subsection (2) of this section;

Disclose any credit score or related information obtained by the creditor after the transaction occurs; or

Provide more than one disclosure to any one consumer per credit transaction.

The creditor's obligation pursuant to subsection (2) of this section and this subsection (3) shall be limited to providing a copy of the information that was received from a consumer reporting agency, as defined in section 5-18-103 (4). A creditor who uses a credit score has no liability under this subsection (3) or subsection (2) of this section for the content of the credit score information received from a consumer reporting agency or from the omission of any information within the report provided by the consumer reporting agency.

"The dollar amount of the finance charge disclosed to you for this credit transaction is based upon your payments being received by the creditor on the date payments are due. If your payments are received after the due date, even if received before the date a late fee applies, you may owe additional and substantial money at the end of the credit transaction and there may be little or no reduction of principal. This is due to the accrual of daily interest until a payment is received."

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1217, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 28, § 5, effective March 9.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 647, § 3, effective July 1, 2003.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1893, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(2), (3)(a)(I), and (3)(b) amended, (HB 17-1238), ch. 260, p. 1170, § 7, effective August 9.

Editor's note:

Although this section was effective July 1, 2000, section 5 of chapter 265, Session Laws of Colorado 2000, provides that the disclosures described in this section are effective January 1, 2001.

5-3-107. Disclosures for consumer credit sale secured by a motor vehicle.

If the property that secures a consumer credit sale includes a motor vehicle and the written agreement does not provide for automobile liability insurance, the following clause shall be in the written agreement in capital letters and bold-face type:

"THIS CONTRACT DOES NOT PROVIDE FOR AUTOMOBILE LIABILITY INSURANCE, AND SAID BUYER ALSO STATES THAT HE OR SHE HAS/DOES NOT HAVE

(strike words not applicable)

IN EFFECT AN AUTOMOBILE LIABILITY POLICY AS DEFINED IN SECTION 42-7-103 (2), COLORADO REVISED STATUTES, ON THE MOTOR VEHICLE SOLD BY THIS CONTRACT."

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1217, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1939, § 4, effective August 5.

5-3-108. Written agreement required.

No consumer credit transaction shall be valid or enforceable in this state unless its terms are contained in a written agreement and a copy is provided to the consumer at or before the time credit is extended. A creditor may provide the copy to the consumer in a form other than paper upon the consumer's written authorization.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1217, § 1, effective July 1.

5-3-109. Records.

Every creditor shall maintain records in conformity with this code, rules adopted thereunder, and generally accepted accounting principles and practices in a manner that will establish that the creditor is complying with the provisions of this code. The record-keeping system of a creditor shall be sufficient if the creditor makes the required information reasonably available. The records pertaining to any credit transaction need not be preserved for more than four years after making the final entry relating to the transaction, but, in the case of a revolving credit account, the four years is measured from the date of each entry.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1217, § 1, effective July 1.

5-3-110. Advertising.

A creditor may not advertise, print, display, publish, distribute, broadcast, transmit or cause to be advertised, printed, displayed, published, distributed, broadcast, or transmitted in any manner any false, misleading, or deceptive statement or representation with regard to the rates, terms, or conditions of credit of a consumer credit transaction.

This section imposes no liability on the owner or personnel, as such, of any medium in which an advertisement appears or through which it is disseminated.

Advertising that complies with the federal "Truth in Lending Act" and the federal "Consumer Leasing Act" does not violate this section.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1217, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 5-2-312 and 5-2-313, as they existed prior to 2000.

Cross references:

For the definitions and federal statutory cites of the "Truth in Lending Act" and the "Consumer Leasing Act", see § 5-1-302.

5-3-111. Use of credit scores.

Any provision in a contract that prohibits the disclosure of a credit score by a consumer reporting agency or a person who makes or arranges loans secured by a dwelling is void. For the purposes of this section, "dwelling" means a residential structure that contains one to four units, whether or not that structure is attached to real property. The term includes an individual condominium unit, cooperative unit, mobile home, or trailer, if it is used as a residence.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 648, § 4, effective July 1, 2003.